Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.08
Examining board; rules and regulations; publication.

The examining board shall make and adopt all bylaws and rules, not inconsistent with law, which are needed in performing its duties. Such rules shall be published in the roster of registrants as provided for in section 81-8,113.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 10.